apertium-ido.ido.fixed.dix
<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun" />
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective" />
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb" />
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Verb" />
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition" />
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun" />
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner" />
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Coordinating conjunction" />
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction" />
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection" />
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular" />
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural" />
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular/Plural" />
    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative" />
    <sdef n="acc" c="Accusative" />
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive" />
    <sdef n="pri" c="Present indicative" />
    <sdef n="pii" c="Past indicative" />
    <sdef n="fti" c="Future indicative" />
    <sdef n="cni" c="Conditional" />
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperative" />
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun" />
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym" />
    <sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen" />
    <sdef n="top" c="Toponym" />
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adv" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adv" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pri" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pii" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="fti" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="imp" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="cni" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ir__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="or__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="Garlitos">
      <i>Garlit</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Majuro">
      <i>Majur</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Rizoido">
      <i>Rizoid</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Villarrobledo">
      <i>Villarrobled</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="alpo">
      <i>alp</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="arkitekto">
      <i>arkitekt</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="bataliono">
      <i>batalion</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="bulbo">
      <i>bulb</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="cunamio">
      <i>cunami</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="domeno-nomo">
      <i>domeno-nom</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="esperanto-himno">
      <i>esperanto-himn</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="flanelo">
      <i>flanel</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="gento">
      <i>gent</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="herbacho">
      <i>herbach</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="karachi">
      <i>karach</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="koyos">
      <i>koy</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="mashinolernado">
      <i>mashinolernad</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="novodevichy kuvento">
      <i>novodevichy kuvent</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="plastiko">
      <i>plastik</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="riboflavino">
      <i>riboflavin</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="spageti">
      <i>spaget</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="umbiliko">
      <i>umbilik</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Bukharia">
      <i>Bukhari</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Digora">
      <i>Digor</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Hungaria">
      <i>Hungari</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Mazda">
      <i>Mazd</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Ruanda">
      <i>Ruand</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Valderrodilla">
      <i>Valderrodill</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="amika">
      <i>amik</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="avida">
      <i>avid</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="burleska">
      <i>burlesk</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="deklinado">
      <i>deklin</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="eleganta">
      <i>elegant</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="fertila">
      <i>fertil</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="gracila">
      <i>gracil</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="imananta">
      <i>iman</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kalma">
      <i>kalm</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kontenta">
      <i>kontent</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="lokala">
      <i>lokal</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="midas">
      <i>mid</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="nuda">
      <i>nud</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="patogena">
      <i>patogen</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="rekoltado">
      <i>rekolt</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="sponjagar">
      <i>sponj</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="volebalo plajala">
      <i>volebalo plajal</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Calamonte">
      <i>Calamont</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Gainesville">
      <i>Gainesvill</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Karlsruhe">
      <i>Karlsruh</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Oiapoque">
      <i>Oiapoqu</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Spree">
      <i>Spre</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Voltaire">
      <i>Voltair</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="afektacema">
      <i>afektac</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="arkero">
      <i>ark</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="belize">
      <i>beliz</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="bruleyo">
      <i>brul</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="chambreto">
      <i>chambr</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="dafne">
      <i>dafn</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="dormetar">
      <i>dorm</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="explorero">
      <i>explor</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ibe">
      <i>ib</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="konsilero">
      <i>konsil</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="maxime">
      <i>maxim</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="parolema">
      <i>parol</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="raptero">
      <i>rapt</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="solidareso">
      <i>solidar</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="surveyero">
      <i>survey</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="yle">
      <i>yl</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Agadir">
      <i>Agad</i>
      <par n="ir__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Alagir">
      <i>Alag</i>
      <par n="ir__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Anadir">
      <i>Anad</i>
      <par n="ir__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Bogor">
      <i>Bog</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="Hair">
      <i>Ha</i>
      <par n="ir__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="aquirar">
      <i>aquir</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="brasar">
      <i>bras</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="chador">
      <i>chad</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="conquistador">
      <i>conquistad</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="deklinar">
      <i>deklin</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="distar">
      <i>dist</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="embragar">
      <i>embrag</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="equador">
      <i>equad</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="exilar">
      <i>exil</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="flarar">
      <i>flar</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="glinar">
      <i>glin</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="hektor">
      <i>hekt</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="holodomor">
      <i>holodom</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="hrisaor">
      <i>hrisa</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="indijar">
      <i>indij</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="invitar">
      <i>invit</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="klozar">
      <i>kloz</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="konfliktar">
      <i>konflikt</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="koordinar">
      <i>koordin</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="levar">
      <i>lev</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="mimar">
      <i>mim</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="odorar">
      <i>odor</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="palikir">
      <i>palik</i>
      <par n="ir__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="persuadar">
      <i>persuad</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="prizentar">
      <i>prizent</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="razar">
      <i>raz</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="reptar">
      <i>rept</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="salvador">
      <i>salvad</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="san-Salvador">
      <i>san-Salvad</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="servir">
      <i>serv</i>
      <par n="ir__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="snortar">
      <i>snort</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="tsaghkadzor">
      <i>tsaghkadz</i>
      <par n="or__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="velkar">
      <i>velk</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
